Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-414
Legislative Council; recommendations; publication.

The recommendations of the council shall be completed and made public at least thirty days prior to any regular session of the Legislature at which such recommendations are to be submitted. A copy of said recommendations shall be mailed to the address of each member of the Legislature, to each elective state officer, and to the State Library.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 10, p. 424;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-510;

R.S.1943, § 50-414.